Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1410
License; form; display; pocket card.

The board shall prescribe the form of the license and each license shall have printed thereon the seal of its office. All licenses shall be mailed to each licensee except the license of each motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer salesperson which shall be delivered or mailed to the motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer dealer by whom the motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer salesperson is employed and be kept in the custody and control of such dealer. It shall be the duty of each dealer to conspicuously display his or her own license or licenses in his or her place or places of business.

The board shall prepare and deliver a pocket card for salespersons, dealer's agents, factory representatives, and distributor representatives. Such card shall certify that the person whose name appears thereon is a licensed motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer salesperson, dealer's agent, factory representative, or distributor representative, as the case may be. Such motor vehicle or trailer salesperson's card shall also contain the name and address of the dealer employing the salesperson.

Laws 1957, c. 280, § 10, p. 1019;

Laws 1963, c. 365, § 7, p. 1173;

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 9;

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 498, § 5.